test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-manzj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - манзь: # Verb 'to say' - partial paradigm

     манзь+V+IV+ConNeg: манˮ
     манзь+V+IV+Evas: мамоӈгад
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+ConNeg: мандˮ
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: манданиʼ
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: мандадиʼ
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: мандӈахаʼ
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: мандаваˮ
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: мандадаˮ
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мандаˮ            
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: мандадмʼ
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: мандан
     манзь+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: манда
     манзь+V+IV+GerFin: маманзь      
     манзь+V+IV+Ger: манзь
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: маниʼ
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: мадиʼ
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [маӈахаʼ, махаʼ]
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: маваˮ
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: мадаˮ
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: маˮ
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: мадмʼ
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ман
     манзь+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ма
     манзь+V+IV+InfImprf: манома  
     манзь+V+IV+InfPrf: маˮма  
     манзь+V+IV+PrcFut: маманда   
     манзь+V+IV+PrcImprf: мана
     манзь+V+IV+PrcNeg: мамдавэй
     манзь+V+IV+PrcPrf: мамы
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxDu1: [мамбˮнаниʼ, мамбаˮниʼ, мамбˮниʼ]
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxDu2: [мамбˮнандиʼ, мамбатиʼ]
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxDu3: [мамбˮнандиʼ, мамбатиʼ]
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxPl1: [мамбˮнанаˮ, мамбаˮнаˮ]
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxPl2: [мамбˮнандаˮ, мамбатаˮ]
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxPl3: [мамбˮнандоʼ, мамбатоʼ]
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxSg1: [мамбˮнани, мамбаˮнани, мамбаˮни, мамбˮни, мамбаˮн, мамбˮнан]
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxSg2: [мамбˮнанд, мамбат]
     манзь+V+IV+Subord+PxSg3: [мамбˮнанда, мамбата] 
     манзь+V+IV+Subord: мамбˮ
